Washington statutes.
RCW 36.12.070

Notice to county clerk and secretary of state.

Whenever any election has been held for change of county seat, the notice given by the board of county commissioners showing the result thereof must be deposited in the office of the county clerk, and a certified copy thereof transmitted to the secretary of state.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.12.070. Prior: 1890 p 319 s 7; RRS s 4004.]